Massachusetts, session 194th, H3977.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 8C of chapter 40 of the General Laws, the select
board of the town of Becket may appoint not more than 2 alternate members to the conservation
commission of the town to serve staggered terms not to exceed 3 years. The chair of the
conservation commission may designate an alternate member to sit on the commission in case
the of absence, inability to act or conflict of interest on the part of a member of the commission
or, if there is a vacancy on the commission, until the vacancy is filled pursuant to said section 8C
of said chapter 40.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1